Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1059.
do enact as follows:SB1059,13Section 1. 943.018 of the statutes is created to read:SB1059,2,31943.018 Depositing tires on private property. Whoever intentionally 2deposits 4 or more tires on the private property of another is guilty of a Class A 3misdemeanor. SB1059,24Section 2. 973.20 (4r) of the statutes is created to read:SB1059,2,75973.20 (4r) Notwithstanding sub. (1r), if the defendant violated s. 943.018, 6the restitution order shall require that the defendant pay an amount equal to the 7actual cost to the property owner to properly dispose of any tires deposited.SB1059,2,88